Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.150

Determination of quota.

(1) Under a market pool and as used in this section, "quota" means a producer's or producer-dealer's portion of the total sales of milk in a market area in fluid form or, in the director's discretion, in other forms.

(2) The director may in each market area subject to a market plan establish each producer's and each producer-dealer's initial quota in the market area. Such initial quotas shall be determined by the department after due notice and the opportunity for a hearing as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. In making this determination, consideration shall be given to a history of the producer's production record. In no case shall a producer-dealer receive as a quota an amount which is less than his or her fluid milk sales for the reference period used by the director in determining quotas for other producers.

In any system of establishing quotas, provision shall be made for new producers to qualify for allocation of quota in a reasonable proportion and for old and new producers to participate in any new increase in available quota in a reasonable proportion. The director may establish a method to proportionately decrease quota allocations in the event decreases in milk usage occur.

All subsequent changes or new quotas issued shall be determined by the department after due notice and the opportunity for a hearing as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1993 c 345 s 10; 1992 c 58 s 5; 1991 c 239 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 15.]